Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-521 Uniform form of written
financing statement and amendment. (a) A filing office that
accepts written records for filing may not refuse to accept a written initial
financing statement in the following form, except for a reason set forth in section
490:9-516(b):

UCC
FINANCING STATEMENT

FOLLOW
INSTRUCTIONS

A. NAME & PHONE OF CONTACT
AT FILER (optional)

_____________________________________________

B. E-MAIL CONTACT AT FILER
(optional)

____________________________________________

C. SEND ACKNOWLEDGMENT TO:
(Name and Address)

______________________________________________

THE ABOVE SPACE IS FOR

FILING OFFICE USE ONLY

1. DEBTOR'S NAME - provide only
one Debtor name (1a or 1b) (use exact, full name; do not omit, modify,
or abbreviate any word in the Debtor's name)

1a.
ORGANIZATION'S
NAME

________________________________________________________________

OR

1b.
INDIVIDUAL'S
SURNAME FIRST
PERSONAL NAME

________________________
_____________________________________

ADDITIONAL NAME(S)/INITIAL(S)
THAT ARE PART OF THE NAME OF THIS DEBTOR SUFFIX

___________________________________________________
_____

1c. MAILING ADDRESS

__________________________________________________________________________

CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

_____________________________ _______ ______________ ____________

2. DEBTOR'S NAME - provide
only one Debtor name (2a or 2b) (use exact, full name; do not omit,
modify, or abbreviate any word in the Debtor's name)

2a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

__________________________________________________________________________

OR

2b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST PERSONAL NAME

__________________________________ ____________________________________

ADDITIONAL
NAME(S)/INITIAL(S) THAT ARE PART OF THE NAME OF THIS DEBTOR SUFFIX

___________________________________________________
_____

2c. MAILING ADDRESS

__________________________________________________________________________

CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

_____________________________ _______ ______________ ____________

3. SECURED PARTY'S NAME (or
NAME of ASSIGNEE of ASSIGNOR SECURED PARTY) - provide only one Secured
Party name (3a or 3b)

3a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

______________________________________________________________________

OR

3b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST PERSONAL NAME

__________________________________ ____________________________________

ADDITIONAL NAME(S)/INITIAL(S) SUFFIX

___________________________________________________
_____

3c. MAILING ADDRESS

________________________________________________________________________

CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

_____________________________ _______ ______________ ____________

4. COLLATERAL: This financing
statement covers the following collateral:

_______________________________________________________________________

5. Check only if
applicable and check only one box:

Collateral is □ held in a Trust (see Instructions)

□ being administered by a Decedent's Personal
Representative.

6a. Check only if
applicable and check only one box:

□ Public-Finance Transaction □ Manufactured-Home
Transaction

□ A Debtor is a Transmitting Utility

6b.
Check only
if applicable and check only one box:

□ Agricultural Lien □ Non-UCC Filing

7. ALTERNATIVE DESIGNATION (if
applicable): □ Lessee/Lessor □ Consignee/Consignor □ Seller/Buyer

□ Bailee/Bailor □ Licensee/Licensor

8. OPTIONAL FILER REFERENCE
DATA

_______________________________________________________________________

[UCC FINANCING STATEMENT
(Form UCC1)]

UCC
FINANCING STATEMENT ADDENDUM

FOLLOW
INSTRUCTIONS

9. NAME OF FIRST DEBTOR (same
as item 1a or 1b on Financing Statement)

9a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

_______________________________________________________________

OR

9b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME

________________________________________________________________________

FIRST PERSONAL NAME

________________________________________________________________________

ADDITIONAL
NAME(S)/INITIAL(S) SUFFIX

___________________________________________________
_____

THE ABOVE SPACE IS FOR

FILING OFFICE USE ONLY

10. ADDITIONAL DEBTOR'S NAME -
provide only one Debtor name (10a or 10b) (use exact, full name; do not
omit, modify, or abbreviate any word in the Debtor's name)

10a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

_______________________________________________________________________

OR

10b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST PERSONAL NAME

____________________________________ _______________________

ADDITIONAL
NAME(S)/INITIAL(S) THAT ARE PART OF THE NAME OF THIS DEBTOR SUFFIX

___________________________________________________
_____

10c. MAILING ADDRESS

______________________________________________________________________

CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

_____________________________ _______ ______________ ____________

11. ADDITIONAL SECURED PARTY'S
NAME or ASSIGNOR SECURED PARTY'S NAME - provide only one name
(11a or 11b)

11a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

______________________________________________________________________

OR

11b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST PERSONAL NAME

__________________________________ ____________________________________

ADDITIONAL
NAME(S)/INITIAL(S) SUFFIX

___________________________________________________
_____

11c. MAILING ADDRESS

_______________________________________________________________________

CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

_____________________________ _______ ______________ ____________

12.
ADDITIONAL
SPACE FOR ITEM 4 (Collateral)

___________________________________________________________________________

13. □ This FINANCING STATEMENT
is to be filed [for record] (or recorded) in the REAL ESTATE RECORDS (if
applicable)

14. This FINANCING STATEMENT:

□ covers timber to be cut □ covers as-extracted
collateral □ is filed as a fixture
filing

15. Name and address of a RECORD
OWNER of real estate described in item 16 (if Debtor does not have a record
interest):

_______________________________________________________________________

16. Description of real estate:

_______________________________________________________________________

17.
MISCELLANEOUS:

________________________________________________________________________

[UCC FINANCING STATEMENT
ADDENDUM (Form UCC1Ad)]

(b) A filing office that accepts written
records for filing may not refuse to accept a written financing statement amendment
in the following form, except for a reason set forth in section 490:9-516(b):

UCC
FINANCING STATEMENT AMENDMENT

FOLLOW
INSTRUCTIONS

A. NAME & PHONE OF CONTACT
AT FILER (optional)

_______________________________________________________________________

B.
E-MAIL
CONTACT AT FILER (optional)

_______________________________________________________________________

C.
SEND
ACKNOWLEDGMENT TO: (Name and Address)

_______________________________________________________________________

THE ABOVE SPACE IS FOR

FILING OFFICE USE ONLY

1a. INITIAL FINANCING STATEMENT FILE NUMBER

_______________________________________________________________________

1b. □ This FINANCING STATEMENT
AMENDMENT is to be filed [for record] (or recorded) in the REAL ESTATE RECORDS.

Filer: attach Amendment Addendum (Form
UCC3Ad) and provide Debtor's name in item 13.

2. □ TERMINATION: Effectiveness
of the Financing Statement identified above is terminated with respect to the
security interest(s) of Secured Party authorizing this Termination Statement

3. □ ASSIGNMENT (full or
partial): Provide name of Assignee in item 7a or 7b, and address of
Assignee in item 7c and name of Assignor in item 9. For partial
assignment, complete items 7 and 9 and also indicate affected collateral
in item 8

4. □ CONTINUATION:
Effectiveness of the Financing Statement identified above with respect to the
security interest(s) of Secured Party authorizing this Continuation Statement
is continued for the additional period provided by applicable law

5. □ PARTY INFORMATION CHANGE:

Check one of these two boxes:

This Change affects □ Debtor or □ Secured Party of record.

AND

Check one of these three boxes to:

□ CHANGE name and/or address: Complete item 6a or
6b, and item 7a or 7b and item 7c.

□ ADD name: Complete item 7a or 7b, and
item 7c.

□ DELETE name: Give record name to be deleted in
item 6a or 6b.

6. CURRENT RECORD INFORMATION:
Complete for Party Information Change - provide only one name (6a or
6b) (use exact, full name; do not omit, modify, or abbreviate any word in the
Debtor's name)

6a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

_______________________________________________________________________

OR

6b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST PERSONAL NAME

__________________________________ ____________________________________

ADDITIONAL NAME(S)/INITIAL(S) SUFFIX

_______________________________________________________________ ________________

7. CHANGED OR ADDED
INFORMATION: Complete for Assignment or Party Information Change - provide only
one name (7a or 7b) (use exact full name; do not omit, modify, or
abbreviate any word in the Debtor's name)

7a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

_______________________________________________________________________

OR

7b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST PERSONAL NAME

__________________________________ ____________________________________

ADDITIONAL
NAME(S)/INITIAL(S) THAT ARE PART OF THE NAME OF THIS DEBTOR SUFFIX

_______________________________________________________________ ____________

7c. MAILING ADDRESS

______________________________________________________________________

CITY STATE POSTAL CODE COUNTRY

_____________________________ _______ ______________ ____________

8. □ COLLATERAL CHANGE:

Also check one of these four boxes:

□ ADD collateral □ DELETE collateral □ RESTATE covered
collateral

□ ASSIGN collateral

Indicate collateral:

9. NAME OF SECURED PARTY OF
RECORD AUTHORIZING THIS AMENDMENT - provide only one name (9a or 9b)
(name of Assignor, if this is an Assignment)

If this is an Amendment authorized by a DEBTOR,
check here □ and provide name of
authorizing Debtor

9a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

______________________________________________________________________

OR

9b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST PERSONAL NAME

__________________________________ ____________________________________

ADDITIONAL NAME(S)/INITIAL(S) SUFFIX

_______________________________________________________________ ____________

10. OPTIONAL FILER REFERENCE
DATA

______________________________________________________________________

[UCC FINANCING STATEMENT
AMENDMENT (Form UCC3)]

UCC FINANCING STATEMENT AMENDMENT ADDENDUM

FOLLOW INSTRUCTIONS

11. INITIAL FINANCING STATEMENT FILE NUMBER (same as
item 1a on Amendment form)

______________________________________________________________________

12. NAME OF PARTY AUTHORIZING
THIS AMENDMENT (same as item 9 on Amendment form)

12a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

_______________________________________________________________________

OR

12b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST PERSONAL NAME

__________________________________ ____________________________________

ADDITIONAL
NAME(S)/INITIAL(S) SUFFIX

______________________________________________________ _____________

THE ABOVE SPACE IS FOR

FILING OFFICE USE ONLY

13. Name of DEBTOR on related
financing statement (Name of a current Debtor of record required for indexing
purposes only in some filing offices - see Instruction for item 13 - insert
only one Debtor name (13a or 13b) (use exact, full name; do not omit,
modify, or abbreviate any word in the Debtor's name)

13a. ORGANIZATION'S NAME

_______________________________________________________________________

OR

13b. INDIVIDUAL'S SURNAME FIRST PERSONAL NAME

__________________________________ ____________________________________

ADDITIONAL NAME(S)/INITIAL(S) SUFFIX

______________________________________________________ ___________

14.
ADDITIONAL
SPACE FOR ITEM 8 (Collateral)

________________________________________________________________________

15. This FINANCING STATEMENT
AMENDMENT: □ covers timber to be cut

□ covers as-extracted collateral □ is filed as a fixture
filing

16. Name and address of a RECORD
OWNER of real estate described in item 17 (if Debtor does not have a record
interest):

_______________________________________________________________________

17. Description of real estate

_______________________________________________________________________

18.
MISCELLANEOUS:

________________________________________________________________________

[UCC FINANCING STATEMENT
AMENDMENT ADDENDUM (Form UCC3Ad) ]

(c) A form that a filing office may not refuse
to accept under subsection (a) or (b) must conform to the format prescribed for
the form by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws. [L
2000, c 241, pt of §1; am L 2012, c 33, §17]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next